Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Compensation Proceedings.
Sec. 23.30.145.
Attorney fees.

Fees for legal services rendered in respect to a claim are not valid unless approved by the board, and the fees may not be less than 25 percent on the first $1,000 of compensation or part of the first $1,000 of compensation, and 10 percent of all sums in excess of $1,000 of compensation. When the board advises that a claim has been controverted, in whole or in part, the board may direct that the fees for legal services be paid by the employer or carrier in addition to compensation awarded; the fees may be allowed only on the amount of compensation controverted and awarded. When the board advises that a claim has not been controverted, but further advises that bona fide legal services have been rendered in respect to the claim, then the board shall direct the payment of the fees out of the compensation awarded. In determining the amount of fees the board shall take into consideration the nature, length, and complexity of the services performed, transportation charges, and the benefits resulting from the services to the compensation beneficiaries.

If an employer fails to file timely notice of controversy or fails to pay compensation or medical and related benefits within 15 days after it becomes due or otherwise resists the payment of compensation or medical and related benefits and if the claimant has employed an attorney in the successful prosecution of the claim, the board shall make an award to reimburse the claimant for the costs in the proceedings, including reasonable attorney fees. The award is in addition to the compensation or medical and related benefits ordered.

If proceedings are had for review of a compensation or medical and related benefits order before a court, the court may allow or increase an attorney’s fees. The fees are in addition to compensation or medical and related benefits ordered and shall be paid as the court may direct.

History.

(§ 26(1), (3), (4) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1969; am § 43 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An unsupervised paralegal may not collect a fee for legal services rendered before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board under this section, because he would be engaging in the unauthorized practice of law if he collected such a fee. April 2, 1998, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board does not have, nor could it have, the authority to award legal fees to unsupervised paralegals. Accordingly, unsupervised paralegals, or anyone other than a licensed attorney, cannot collect legal fees under the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act. April 2, 1998, Op. Att’y Gen.